Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the present Constitution of Kentucky
to add a new section requiring the Commonwealth to exercise any federally available
option to expand eligibility for the Medicaid program and prohibiting additional burdens
or restrictions on eligibility or enrollment standards except as may be required under
federal law?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In order to provide for the health and welfare of the residents of the
Commonwealth, the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall exercise any federally available
option, now existing or existing in the future, to expand eligibility for the Medicaid
program. Any person who qualifies under this section shall receive coverage that meets
or exceeds the benchmark or benchmark-equivalent coverage requirements, as those
terms are defined by federal law.
(2) The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not impose greater or additional
burdens or restrictions on eligibility or enrollment standards, methodologies, or
practices on any person eligible under this section than those imposed on any person
otherwise eligible for Medicaid under Kentucky law, except that the Commonwealth of
Kentucky may, to the extent required by federal law or regulation, impose a work
requirement or cost-sharing requirement on any person eligible under this section.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1594
Secretary of State shall cause the question in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the
proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section 2 of this Act
to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in this
state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner the
fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or rejection at
the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be voted for.
The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415 shall be made no later than the
first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have
the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed